Wisconsin, session 2025, AB897.
do enact as follows:AB897,11Section 1. 48.243 (1) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB897,2,2248.243 (1) (g) The If the child is an Indian child, the right to a jury trial.AB897,23Section 2. 48.31 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB897,3,7448.31 (2) The A hearing on a petition under s. 48.13 or 48.133 concerning a 5child other than an Indian child shall be to the court. A hearing on a petition under 6s. 48.13 or 48.133 concerning an Indian child or on a termination of parental rights 7petition shall be to the court unless the child, the child’s parent, guardian, or legal 8custodian, the unborn child’s guardian ad litem, or the expectant mother of the 9unborn child exercises the right to a jury trial by demanding a jury trial at any time 10before or during the plea hearing. If a jury trial is demanded in a proceeding under 11s. 48.13 or 48.133, the jury shall consist of 6 persons. If a jury trial is demanded in 12a proceeding under s. 48.42, the jury shall consist of 12 persons unless the parties 13agree to a lesser number. Chapters 756 and 805 shall govern the selection of jurors. 14If the hearing involves a child victim or witness, as defined in s. 950.02, the court 15may order that a deposition be taken by audiovisual means and allow the use of a 16recorded deposition under s. 967.04 (7) to (10) and, with the district attorney, shall 17comply with s. 971.105. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court or jury shall 18make a determination of the facts, except that in a case alleging a child or an 19unborn child to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 or 48.133, the 20court shall make the determination under s. 48.13 (intro.) or 48.133 relating to 1whether the child or unborn child is in need of protection or services that can be 2ordered by the court. If the court finds that the child or unborn child is not within 3the jurisdiction of the court or, in a case alleging a child or an unborn child to be in 4need of protection or services under s. 48.13 or 48.133, that the child or unborn 5child is not in need of protection or services that can be ordered by the court, or if 6the court or jury finds that the facts alleged in the petition have not been proved, 7the court shall dismiss the petition with prejudice.AB897,38Section 3. 48.422 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:AB897,3,14948.422 (4m) Notwithstanding s. 48.29 (1), substitution of judge in a 10proceeding under this subchapter may be requested only by the petitioner and the 11parent. No party may file more than one request for substitution in any one action, 12nor may any request for substitution name more than one judge. If a new judge is 13assigned to the proceeding, a request for substitution must be made within 10 days 14of receipt of notice of assignment.AB897,415Section 4. Initial applicability.AB897,3,1716(1) This act first applies to a petition that is filed under s. 48.13, 48.133, or 1748.42 on the effective date of this subsection.AB897,3,1818